src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON LAGAN_LAGAS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Attr:%> K ;
!:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;			!no comp.
 +A+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +A+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;  L2
 +A+Ess:%>in K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:00%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> K ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>a R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +A+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +A+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +A+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +A+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +A+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +A+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +A+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +A+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +A+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +A+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +A+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +A+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>istti%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +A+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +A+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +A+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +A+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 -+Use/Circ:#- ProperNoun ; ! ! Definitely circular x 35000.


LEXICON AHKASAS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Attr:aš%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:aš%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ažža%> PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +A+Cmp/SgNom:aš%> R ;
 +A+Ess:ažža%>n K ;
 +A+Ess+Err/Orth:ažža%>n%> PxC ;
 +A+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:ažža%>t%> K ;
! +A+Use/-Spell:aš VUOHTA ;  L2
 +A:ažža%> HEAPMIOBL ;
! :ažž DEARVVASLAS ; !not here since these have no comp. forms

LEXICON AHKASAS_PL !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Attr:aš%> K ;
 +A+Cmp/SgNom:aš%> R ;
 +A+Ess:ažža%>n K ;
 +A+Ess+Err/Orth:ažža%>n%> PxC ;
! +A+Use/-Spell:aš VUOHTA ;  L2
 +A:ažža%> HEAPMIOBL ;

LEXICON IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS	!
 :ihkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ihkkal ETNOLOGALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ikal ETNOLOGALAS ;

LEXICON ETNOLOGALAS	!like AHKASAS but with adverbs
AHKASAS ; 
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ačča%>t K ;


LEXICON SISKKALDAS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +A+Attr:as%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:as%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:assa%> PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +A+Cmp/SgNom:as%> R ;
 +A+Ess:assa%>n K ;
 +A+Ess+Err/Orth:assa%>n%> PxC ;
! +A+Use/-Spell:as VUOHTA ;  L2
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:asa%>t K ;
 +A:assa%> EABBUCASE2 ;	!not to LASJOBL



!LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1 !!= * __@CODE@__  L2
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»W4heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»W4heapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»W4heapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»W4hin K ;		!
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»W4his%> ATTR ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»W4h EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»W4huvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
! +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»W4huhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

!LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1Long !!= * __@CODE@__  L2
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»X4heapmi%>X1n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»X4heapmi%>X7n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»X4heapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»X4heapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»X4hin K ;		!
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4his%> ATTR ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X4h EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»X4huvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
! +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»X4huhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

!LEXICON DenominalAdjsV1Short !!= * __@CODE@__  L2
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X8heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»X8heapmi%>X1n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»X8heapmi%>X7n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»X8heapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess+Err/Orth:»X8heapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»X8hin K ;		!
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X8his%> ATTR ;
!! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X8his VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
! +Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»X8h EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»X8huvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
! +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»X8huhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;




LEXICON DenominalAdjsV2 !!= * __@CODE@__
! +Der1+Der/laš+A+Use/-Spell:»X6l EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;		!WeG  L2
 +Der1+Der/laš:»X6lažž        DEARVVASLAS2 ; 
 +Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:»X6lažža%> PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:»X6lažža%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess+Err/Orth:»X6lažža%>n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
! +Der1+Der/laš+A+Use/-Spell:»X6lažža%>X4 BU/MUS ;   L2 
 +Der1+Der/laš+A:»X6lažža%> HEAPMIOBL ;
