src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpedemokráhtalaš+CmpN/First:eahpe#demokráhtal ETNOLOGALAS ;
LEXICON Adjective
pedofiillalaš:pedofiillal ETNOLOGALAS ;
elektronihkalaš:elektron IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
faláštallanfágalaš:faláštallan#fágal ETNOLOGALAS ;
dutkanetihkalaš:dutkan#et IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
alfanumeralaš:alfanumeral ETNOLOGALAS ;
vuolledássásaš:vuolle#dássás AHKASAS ;
antihkalaš:ant IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
antropologalaš:antropologal ETNOLOGALAS ;
atelihkalaš:atel IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
austrálalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:austrálal AHKASAS ;
autonomalaš:autonomal ETNOLOGALAS ;
falástallanpolitihkalaš:falástallan#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
valáštallanpolitihkalaš:valáštallan#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
skuvlenpolitihkalaš:skuvlen#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
oktasašpolitihkalaš:oktasaš#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
minoriteahttapolitihkalaš:minoriteahtta#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
dálkkádatpolitihkalaš:dálkkádat#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
bargofápmopolitihkalaš:bargo7#fápmo7#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
álbmotkultuvrralaš:álbmot#kultuvrral ETNOLOGALAS ;
smiehttanvullosaš:smiehttan#vullos AHKASAS ;
buorremenolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorre7#menol ETNOLOGALAS ;
danveardásaš:dan#veardás AHKASAS ;
demográfalaš:demo^gráfal ETNOLOGALAS ;
viđadiibmosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viđa#diibmos AHKASAS ;
distrivttapolitihkalaš:di^strivtta#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
doaimmahuslaš:doaimmahusl ETNOLOGALAS ;
dearvvašvuođapolitihkalaš:dearvvašvuođa#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
dramatihkalaš:dramat IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
duppalgeardásaš:duppal#geardás AHKASAS ;
dábálašpolitihkalaš:dábálaš#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
kultureaktodáhtolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kultur#eakto7#dáhtol ETNOLOGALAS ;
ealáhuspolitihkalaš:ealáhus#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
eanalaš:eanal AHKASAS ;
eatnandieđalaš:eatnan#dieđal ETNOLOGALAS ;
eanadoallopolitihkalaš+v3:eatnan#doallo#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
earálágan+Err/Sub:eara#lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
earálágan+Err/Sub:eará#lagan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
earálágan+Err/Sub:eara#lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
ekonomiijapolitihkalaš:ekonomiija#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
empiralaš:empiral ETNOLOGALAS ;
epihkalaš:ep IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
indoeurohpálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:indo#eurohpál AHKASAS ;
fiberoptihkalaš:fiber#opt IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
fidnomáhtolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fidno7#máhtol ETNOLOGALAS ;
fylkkagielddalaš+Err/Sub:fylka#gieldal ETNOLOGALAS ;
galljosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:galljos AHKASAS ;
geometralaš:geometral ETNOLOGALAS ;
gielagaskasaš:giela#gaskas AHKASAS ;
giellapolitihkalaš:giella#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
ovttabeaivásaš:ovtta#beaivás AHKASAS ;
njealjelotjahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njealje#lot#jahkás AHKASAS ;
gonagasmielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gonagas#mielal ETNOLOGALAS ;
grammatihkalaš:grammat IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
gullevaš:gullev AHKASAS ;
guovttágaskasaš:guovttá#gaskas AHKASAS ;
guvllolaš+Err/Sub:guovlul ETNOLOGALAS ;
helssetlaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:helssetl AHKASAS ;
preassaetihkalaš:preassa#et IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
luondduhistorjjálaš:luonddu#historjjál ETNOLOGALAS ;
gávpotpolitihkalaš:gávpot#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
njunálaš:njunál ETNOLOGALAS ;
ideologalaš:ideologal ETNOLOGALAS ;
intrakultuvrralaš:intra#kultuvrral ETNOLOGALAS ;
jahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jahkás AHKASAS ;
kazakhiskalaš:kazakhiskal ETNOLOGALAS ;
kemihkalaš:kem IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
logikilosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:logi#kilos AHKASAS ;
servodatpolitihkalaš:servodat#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
kulttorhistorjjálaš:kulttor#historjjál ETNOLOGALAS ;
legendáralaš:legendáral AHKASAS ;
logihkalaš:log IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
láhkafámolaš:láhka#fámol ETNOLOGALAS ;
sáddenteknihkalaš:sádden#tekn IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
klinihkalaš:klin IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
mahtosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:mahtos AHKASAS ;
mearrediđolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mearre7#diđol ETNOLOGALAS ;
mearreáigásaš:mearre#áigás AHKASAS ;
minerálalaš:minerálal ETNOLOGALAS ;
14-vahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:14-vahkkos AHKASAS ;
46-vahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:46-vahkkos AHKASAS ;
preassafágalaš:preassa#fágal ETNOLOGALAS ;
márkemearrásaš:márke#mearrás AHKASAS ;
logigeardásaš:logi#geardás AHKASAS ;
6%0%0%0-geardásaš:6%0%0%0%-geardás AHKASAS ;
nominatiivvahápmásaš:nominatiivva#hápmás AHKASAS ;
nuoraidpolitihkalaš:nuoraid9#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
oamedovddolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oame7#dovddol ETNOLOGALAS ;
olgguldas:olgguld SISKKALDAS ;
ovdamearkkalaš:ovda#mearkkal AHKASAS ;
iešguđegeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#guđege#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iešguđetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#guđet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
goabbatahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goabbat#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
ovttaivnnálaš:ovtta#ivnnál ETNOLOGALAS ;
palestinalaš+Err/Sub:palestiinnál AHKASAS ;
pedagogalaš:pedagogal ETNOLOGALAS ;
pragmatihkalaš:pragmat IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
priváhttarievttálaš:priváhtta#rievttál ETNOLOGALAS ;
retorihkalaš:retor IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
oktasašristtalaš:oktasaš#risttal ETNOLOGALAS ;
čearddalašromantihkalaš:čearddalaš#romant IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
eallinguhkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eallin#guhkkos AHKASAS ;
seammalágan+Use/NG+Err/Sub:seammá#lágan LAGAN_LAGAS ;
seammalágan+Use/NG+Err/Sub:seammá#lágán LAGAN_LAGAS ;
siskkáldas+Err/Sub:siskkald SISKKALDAS ;
siskkáldas+Err/Sub:siskáld SISKKALDAS ;
siskkildas:siskkild SISKKALDAS ;
siskkáldas:siskkáld SISKKALDAS ;
skoválaš:skovál ETNOLOGALAS ;
statihkalaš:stat IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
subtropalaš:sub^tropal ETNOLOGALAS ;
subárktalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sub9#árktal AHKASAS ;
sámepolitihkalaš:sáme7#polit IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
sátnesiskkáldas:sátne#siskkáld SISKKALDAS ;
tragihkalaš:trag IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
vahkkosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vahkkos AHKASAS ;
luondduveahkaválddálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luonddu#veahka#válddál ETNOLOGALAS ;
dienahkásaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dien#ahkás AHKASAS ;
iežameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iehčameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehčame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežadeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežade#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežaskaahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežaska#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iehčametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iehčamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežadetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežadet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
iežasetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iežaset#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
nuppiluohkálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuppi#luohkál AHKASAS ;
áicevaš:áicev ETNOLOGALAS ;
čakčasaš:čakčas AHKASAS ;
VVS-teknihkalaš:VVS-tekn IHKALAS-ETNOLOGALAS ;
2%0-mánnosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:2%0%-mánnos AHKASAS ;
1%0-mánnosaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:1%0%-mánnos AHKASAS ;
jiešdagolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#dagol ETNOLOGALAS ;
jiešguđegeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#guđege#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiešguđetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#guđet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiehčameahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiehčame#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežadeahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežade#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežaskaahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežaska#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiehčametahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiehčamet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežadetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežadet#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
jiežasetahkásaččat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiežaset#ahkás AHKASAS_PL ;
nuppáldas:nuppáld SISKKALDAS ;
nuortagielalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuorta#gielal AHKASAS ;
